Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201644-5502
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Surplus Lines Insurance Act:

(1) Affiliated
group means a group of entities in which each entity, with respect to an insured,
controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with the insured;

(2) Control
means:

(a) To own, control, or have the power of an entity directly, indirectly,
or acting through one or more other persons to vote twenty-five percent or
more of any class of voting securities of another entity; or

(b) To direct,
by an entity, in any manner, the election of a majority of the directors or
trustees of another entity;

(3) Department
means the Department of Insurance;

(4) Director means the Director
of Insurance;

(5)(a) Exempt commercial purchaser means
any person purchasing commercial insurance that, at the time of placement,
meets the following requirements:

(i) The person employs or retains a qualified
risk manager to negotiate insurance coverage;

(ii) The person has paid
aggregate nationwide commercial property and casualty insurance premiums in
excess of one hundred thousand dollars in the immediately preceding twelve
months; and

(iii) The person meets at least one of the following criteria:

(A) The person
possesses a net worth in excess of twenty million dollars, as such amount
is adjusted pursuant to subdivision (5)(b) of this section;

(B) The person
generates annual revenue in excess of fifty million dollars, as such amount
is adjusted pursuant to subdivision (5)(b) of this section;

(C) The person
employs more than five hundred full-time or full-time equivalent employees
per individual insured or is a member of an affiliated group employing more
than one thousand employees in the aggregate;

(D) The person is a not-for-profit
organization or public entity generating annual budgeted expenditures of at
least thirty million dollars, as such amount is adjusted pursuant to subdivision
(5)(b) of this section; or

(E) The person is a municipality with a
population in excess of fifty thousand inhabitants.

(b) Beginning on the fifth
occurrence of January 1 after July 21, 2011, and each fifth occurrence of
January 1 thereafter, the amounts in subdivisions (5)(a)(iii)(A), (B), and
(D) of this section shall be adjusted to reflect the percentage change for
such five-year period in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers
published by the Federal Bureau of Labor Statistics;

(6) Foreign, alien, admitted,
and nonadmitted, when referring to insurers, has the same meanings as in section
44-103 but does not include
a risk retention group as defined in 15 U.S.C. 3901(a)(4);

(7)(a) Except
as provided in subdivision (7)(b) of this section, home state means, with
respect to an insured, (i) the state in which an insured maintains its principal
place of business or, in the case of an individual, the individual's principal
residence or (ii) if one hundred percent of the insured risk is located out
of the state referred to in subdivision (7)(a)(i) of this section, the state
to which the greatest percentage of the insured's taxable premium for that
insurance contract is allocated.

(b) If more than one insured from an affiliated
group are named insureds on a single nonadmitted insurance contract, home
state means the home state, as determined pursuant to subdivision (7)(a) of
this section, of the member of the affiliated group that has the largest percentage
of premium attributed to it under such insurance contract.

(c) When determining
the home state of the insured, the principal place of business is the state
in which the insured maintains its headquarters and where the insured's high-level
officers direct, control, and coordinate the business activities of the insured;

(8) Insurer
has the same meaning as in section 44-103;

(9) Nonadmitted insurance means any property
and casualty insurance permitted to be placed directly or through surplus
lines licensees with a nonadmitted insurer eligible to accept such insurance;
and

(10) Qualified risk manager means, with respect to a policyholder
of commercial insurance, a person who meets the definition in section 527
of the Nonadmitted and Reinsurance Reform Act of 2010, which is Subtitle B
of the Dodd-Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act, Public Law
111-203, as such section existed on January 1, 2011.

Laws 1992, LB 1006, § 2;

Laws 2007, LB117, § 22;

Laws 2011, LB70, § 1.